Texas statutes.
LABOR CODE

TITLE 4. EMPLOYMENT SERVICES AND UNEMPLOYMENT

SUBTITLE C. VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION AND CERTAIN OTHER SERVICES FOR PERSONS WITH DISABILITIES

CHAPTER 351. GENERAL PROVISIONS; RESPONSIBILITY FOR ADMINISTRATION OF SERVICES

Sec. 351.001. DEFINITIONS. In this subtitle:

(1) "Department" means the Department of Assistive and Rehabilitative Services.

(2) "Executive commissioner" means the executive commissioner of the Health and Human Services Commission.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (S.B. 208), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 351.002. RESPONSIBILITY FOR ADMINISTRATION OF SERVICES AND PROGRAMS. (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the department shall administer the services and programs under this subtitle until September 1, 2016. On that date, the department shall cease administering the services and programs and the commission shall begin administering the services and programs, subject to receipt of any required federal approval.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (S.B. 208), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 351.003. DESIGNATED STATE UNIT FOR VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION SERVICES. In accordance with the requirements of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Section 701 et seq.), the commission shall establish a designated state unit within the commission that:

(1) is an organizational unit designated to be primarily responsible for and concerned with vocational rehabilitation of individuals with disabilities;

(2) has a full-time director;

(3) has a staff employed on the rehabilitation work of the organizational unit, all or substantially all of whom are employed full-time on such work; and

(4) is located at an organizational level and has an organizational status within the commission comparable to that of other major organizational units of the commission.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (S.B. 208), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 351.005. MEANING OF CERTAIN REFERENCES IN LAW. Until the administration of this subtitle is transferred from the department to the commission, a reference to the commission or the executive director in this subtitle means the department, commissioner of assistive and rehabilitative services, or executive commissioner, as applicable.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1138 (S.B. 208), Sec. 25, eff. September 1, 2015.